Utah statutes.
76-10-503.   Restrictions on possession, purchase, transfer, and ownership
of dangerous weapons by certain persons.
(1)  For purposes of this section:
(a)  A Category I restricted person is a person who:
(i)  has been convicted of any violent felony as defined in Section
76-3-203.5;
(ii)  is on probation or parole for any felony;
(iii)  is on parole from a secure facility as defined in Section 62A-7-101; or
(iv)  within the last 10 years has been adjudicated delinquent for an offense
which if committed by an adult would have been a violent felony as defined in
Section 76-3-203.5.
(b)  A Category II restricted person is a person who:
(i)  has been convicted of or is under indictment for any felony;
(ii)  within the last seven years has been adjudicated delinquent for an
offense which if committed by an adult would have been a felony;
(iii)  is an unlawful user of a controlled substance as defined in Section
58-37-2;
(iv)  is in possession of a dangerous weapon and is knowingly and
intentionally in unlawful possession of a Schedule I or II controlled
substance as defined in Section 58-37-2;
(v)  has been found not guilty by reason of insanity for a felony offense;
(vi)  has been found mentally incompetent to stand trial for a felony offense;
(vii)  has been adjudicated as mentally defective as provided in the Brady
Handgun Violence Prevention Act, Pub. L. No. 103-159, 107 Stat. 1536 (1993),
or has been committed to a mental institution;
(viii)  is an alien who is illegally or unlawfully in the United States;
(ix)  has been dishonorably discharged from the armed forces; or
(x)  has renounced his citizenship after having been a citizen of the United
States.
(2)  A Category I restricted person who intentionally or knowingly agrees,
consents, offers, or arranges to purchase, transfer, possess, use, or have
under his custody or control, or who intentionally or knowingly purchases,
transfers, possesses, uses, or has under his custody or control:
(a)  any firearm is guilty of a second degree felony; or
(b)  any dangerous weapon other than a firearm is guilty of a third degree
felony.
(3)  A Category II restricted person who purchases, transfers, possesses,
uses, or has under his custody or control:
(a)  any firearm is guilty of a third degree felony; or
(b)  any dangerous weapon other than a firearm is guilty of a class A
misdemeanor.
(4)  A person may be subject to the restrictions of both categories at the
same time.
(5)  If a higher penalty than is prescribed in this section is provided in
another section for one who purchases, transfers, possesses, uses, or has
under this custody or control any dangerous weapon, the penalties of that
section control.
(6)  It is an affirmative defense to a charge based on the definition in
Subsection (1)(b)(iv) that the person was:
(a)  in possession of a controlled substance pursuant to a lawful order of a
practitioner for use of a member of the person's household or for
administration to an animal owned by the person or a member of the person's
household; or
(b)  otherwise authorized by law to possess the substance.
